Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1316.
Furnishing data.

Upon request therefor, the Commissioner shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and such recipient’s rights to further benefits under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1317.
Railroad Retirement Board.

The Commissioner may make available to the Railroad Retirement Board such records relating to the administration of this chapter as that Board deems necessary for its purposes in administering the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act and may furnish copies of such records to the Board at the latter’s expense.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1318.
Reciprocal benefit arrangements.

The Commissioner is hereby authorized to enter into arrangements with the appropriate agencies of other states or the federal government whereby potential rights to benefits accumulated under the unemployment compensation laws of the several states or under such law of the federal government, or both, may constitute the basis for the payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency under terms which the Commissioner finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests and will not result in any substantial loss to the Fund, and the Commissioner is authorized to reimburse such state or federal agency for such benefits as may be paid by that agency upon the basis of wages received in employment subject to this chapter or to receive from such state or federal agency such amounts as may be paid from the Fund upon the basis of wages received in employment subject to the laws of such state or of the federal government.

The Commissioner shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of compensation on the basis of combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under this chapter with his wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation laws of other states which are approved by the Secretary of Labor of the United States in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the prompt and full payment of compensation in such situation and which include provisions for:

applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combining of an individual’s wages and employment covered under two or more state unemployment compensation laws; and

avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of such combining.

Reimbursements paid from the Fund pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be benefits for the purposes of this chapter, except that no charge on account of said reimbursements shall be made to an employer’s experience rating record under subsection 1325(a) of this title. Benefits paid from the Fund to an individual, under arrangements entered into pursuant to this section, shall not be charged to an employer’s experience rating record under subsection 1325(a) of this title when such benefits would not have been payable to the individual but for this section because of lack of wages in subject employment necessary to qualify for benefits under section 1338 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1969, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 9, 1970;

1971, No. 77

, § 2, eff. Dec. 31, 1971.

§ 1319.
Agreements for collection and payment of contributions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1301(6)(A) of this title, the Commissioner is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the appropriate agencies of other states or the federal government adjusting the collecting and payment of contributions by employers for services of individuals not performed wholly within the jurisdiction of this State. Under the agreements, services may be agreed to be considered for all purposes, in the Commissioner’s discretion, as wholly within or wholly outside of the jurisdiction of this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

2021, No. 20

, § 221.

§ 1320.
Investigations; general powers.

The Commissioner is authorized to make such investigations, secure and transmit such information, make available such services and facilities, and exercise such of the other powers provided herein with respect to the administration of this chapter as the Commissioner deems necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of any unemployment compensation or public employment service law, and in like manner, to accept and utilize information, services, and facilities made available to this State by any agency charged with the administration of any such other unemployment compensation or public employment service law. To the extent permissible under the laws and constitution of the United States, the Commissioner of Labor is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under this chapter and facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law of any foreign government, may be utilized for the taking of claims and the payment of benefits under this chapter, or under a similar law of such government.

On request of an agency which administers an employment security law of another state or of a foreign government, and which has found in accordance with the provisions of such law that an individual is liable to repay benefits received under such law, the Commissioner may collect from the individual the amount of such benefits to be refunded to such agency, and such amounts may be collected by civil action in the name of the Commissioner acting as agent for such agency.

Records, with any necessary authentication thereof, required in the prosecution of any criminal action brought by another state or foreign government for misrepresentation to obtain benefits under the law of this State shall be made available to the agency administering the employment security law of any such state or foreign government for the purpose of such prosecution.

The Commissioner may begin and prosecute civil proceedings in any other state to collect contributions, penalties, and interest legally due under this chapter. The officials of other states which extend a like comity to this State may sue for the collection of contributions, interest, and penalties imposed by those other states, in the courts of this State; in any such case the Commissioner of Labor of this State may through his or her legal assistant, begin and conduct the suit for the other state. The courts of this State shall recognize and enforce liability for those contributions, interest, and penalties imposed by other states which extend a like comity to this State.

The Commissioner may enter into or cooperate in arrangements or reciprocal agreements with authorized agencies of other states by which:

overpayments of benefits as determined under this chapter may be recovered by offset from benefits otherwise payable under the unemployment compensation law of another state; and

overpayments of benefits as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state may be recovered by offset from benefits otherwise payable under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1967, No. 88

, eff. April 12, 1967;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

1991, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1321.
Contributions; taxable wage base changes.

Payment of Contributions. Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer for each calendar year in which he or she is subject to this chapter, with respect to wages paid for employment, as defined in subdivision 1301(6) of this title, occurring during such calendar year, except as otherwise provided in this section. The contributions shall become due and be payable at such time and in such installments as the Board prescribes.

Base of Contributions. Subsequent to December 31, 1982, the term “wages” shall not include that part of remuneration which, after remuneration equal to $8,000.00 has been paid in a calendar year to an individual by an employer with respect to employment during a calendar year, unless that part of the remuneration is subject to a tax under a federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund. For the period January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, the term “wages” shall not include that part of remuneration which, after remuneration equal to $10,000.00 has been paid in a calendar year to an individual by an employer with respect to employment during a calendar year, unless that part of the remuneration is subject to a tax under a federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund. The term “wages” shall not include that part of remuneration which, after remuneration equal to $13,000.00 on January 1, 2011, and $16,000.00 on January 1, 2012, has been paid in a calendar year to an individual by an employer with respect to employment during a calendar year, unless that part of the remuneration is subject to a tax under a federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund. After January 1, 2012, whenever the Unemployment Compensation Fund has a positive balance and all advances made to the State Unemployment Compensation Fund pursuant to Title XII of the Social Security Act have been repaid as of June 1, the base of contribution amount shall be adjusted on January 1 of the following year by the same percentage as any increase in the State annual average wage as calculated by subsection 1338(g) of this title. When the unemployment contribution rate schedule established by subsection 1326(e) of this title is reduced to schedule III, the base of contribution amount shall be reduced by $2,000.00 on January 1 of the following year and shall be adjusted annually thereafter on January 1 of the following year by the same percentage as any increase in the State annual average wage as calculated by subsection 1338(g) of this title. When the unemployment contribution rate schedule established by subsection 1326(e) of this title is reduced to schedule I, the base of contribution amount shall be reduced by $2,000.00 on January 1 of the following year and shall be adjusted annually thereafter on January 1 of the following year by the same percentage as any increase in the State annual average wage as calculated by subsection 1338(g) of this title. For the purposes of this subsection:

Any employer who acquired the entire or a distinct and severable portion of the organization, trade, or business of an employer shall be treated as a single unit with its predecessor for the calendar year in which such acquisition occurs; and

The term employment shall include service constituting employment under any unemployment compensation law of another state.

Financing benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations. Benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations shall be financed in accordance with the provisions of this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a nonprofit organization is an organization (or group of organizations) described in Section 501(c)(3) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from income tax under Section 501(a) of such Code.
(c) (1) Financing benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations. Benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations shall be financed in accordance with the provisions of this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a nonprofit organization is an organization (or group of organizations) described in Section 501(c)(3) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from income tax under Section 501(a) of such Code.

Liability for contributions and election of reimbursement. Any nonprofit organization which, pursuant to subdivision 1301(5)(B)(i) of this title, is, or becomes, subject to this chapter on or after January 1, 1972 shall pay contributions under the provisions of this section, unless it elects, in accordance with this subsection, to pay to the Commissioner, for the Unemployment Fund, an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and of one-half of the extended benefits paid, that is attributable to service in the employ of such nonprofit organization, to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin during the effective period of such election.

Any nonprofit organization which is, or becomes, subject to this chapter on January 1, 1972 may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than one calendar year beginning with January 1, 1972 provided it files with the Commissioner a written notice of its election within the 30-day period immediately following such date or within a like period immediately following April 16, 1971, whichever occurs later.

Any nonprofit organization which becomes subject to this chapter after January 1, 1972 may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than 12 months beginning with the date on which such subjectivity begins by filing a written notice of its election with the Commissioner not later than 30 days immediately following the date of the determination of such subjectivity.

Any nonprofit organization which makes an election in accordance with subdivisions (c)(2)(A) and (B) of this section will continue to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions until it files with the Commissioner a written notice terminating its election not later than 30 days prior to the beginning of the calendar year for which such termination shall first be effective.

Any nonprofit organization which has been paying contributions under this chapter for a period subsequent to January 1, 1972 may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the Commissioner not later than 30 days prior to the beginning of any calendar year a written notice of election to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions. Such election shall not be terminable by the organization for that year and the next year.

The Commissioner may for good cause extend the period within which a notice of election, or a notice of termination, must be filed and may permit an election to be retroactive but not any earlier than with respect to benefits paid after December 31, 1969.

The Commissioner, in accordance with such rules as the Board may prescribe, shall notify each nonprofit organization of any determination which he or she may make of its status as an employer and of the effective date of any election which it makes and of any termination of such election. Such determinations shall be subject to reconsideration and to appeal and review in accordance with the provisions of section 1337a of this title.

Reimbursement payments. Payments in lieu of contributions shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision, including either subdivision (A) or subdivision (B).

At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall bill each nonprofit organization, or group of such organizations, which has elected to make payments in lieu of contributions for an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits plus one-half of the amount of extended benefits paid during such quarter or other prescribed period that is attributable to service in the employ of such organization.

Each nonprofit organization that has elected payments in lieu of contributions may request permission to make such payments as provided in this subdivision. Such method of payment shall become effective upon approval of the Commissioner.
(B) (i) Each nonprofit organization that has elected payments in lieu of contributions may request permission to make such payments as provided in this subdivision. Such method of payment shall become effective upon approval of the Commissioner.

At the end of each calendar quarter, the Commissioner shall bill each nonprofit organization for an amount representing one of the following:

For 1972, two-tenths of one percent of its total payroll for 1971.

For years after 1972, such percentage of its total payroll for the immediately preceding calendar year as the Commissioner shall determine. The determination shall be based each year on the average benefit costs attributable to service in the employ of nonprofit organizations during the preceding calendar year.

For any organization which did not pay wages throughout the four calendar quarters of the preceding calendar year, such percentage of its payroll during that year as the Commissioner shall determine.

At the end of each calendar year, the Commissioner may modify the quarterly percentage of payroll thereafter payable by the nonprofit organization in order to minimize excess or insufficient payments.

At the end of each calendar year, the Commissioner shall determine whether the total of payments for such year made by a nonprofit organization is less than, or in excess of, the total amount of regular benefits plus one-half of the amount of extended benefits paid to individuals during such taxable year based on wages attributable to service in the employ of such organization. Each nonprofit organization whose total payments for such year are less than the amount so determined shall be liable for payment of the unpaid balance to the Fund in accordance with subdivision (3)(C) of this subsection (c). If the total payments exceed the amount so determined for the taxable year, all or a part of the excess shall, at the election of the nonprofit organization, be refunded from the Fund or retained in the Fund as part of the payments which may be required for the next calendar year.

Payment of any bill rendered under subdivision (2) or subdivision (3) of this subsection (c) shall be made not later than 30 days after the bill is mailed to the last known address of the nonprofit organization or is otherwise delivered to it, unless there has been an application for redetermination by the Commissioner or a petition for hearing before a referee in accordance with subdivision (3)(E) of this subsection (c).

Payments made by any nonprofit corporation under the provisions of this section shall not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the organization.

The amount due specified in any bill from the Commissioner shall be conclusive on the organization unless, not later than 30 days after the date of the bill, the organization files an application for reconsideration by the Commissioner, or a petition for a hearing before a referee, setting forth the grounds for such application or petition. The Commissioner shall promptly review and reconsider the amount due specified in the bill and shall thereafter issue a redetermination in any case in which such application for redetermination has been filed. Any such redetermination shall be conclusive on the organization unless, not later than 30 days after the date of the redetermination, the organization files a petition for a hearing before a referee, setting forth the grounds for the petition. Proceedings on the petition for a hearing before a referee on the amount of a bill rendered under this section or a redetermination of such amount shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 1331 of this title, and the decision of the referee shall be subject to the provisions of that section. Review of the decision of the referee by the Employment Security Board shall be in accordance with, and its decision shall be subject to, the provisions of section 1332 of this title.

Any employer including the State of Vermont which makes payments in lieu of contributions under this section shall be subject to the provisions of sections 1314, 1322, 1328, 1329, 1334, and 1336 of this title as follows:

that employer shall be liable for any reports as the Commissioner may require pursuant to sections 1314 and 1322 of this title;

that employer shall be liable for any penalty imposed pursuant to sections 1314 and 1328 of this title;

that employer shall be liable for the same interest on past due payments pursuant to subsection 1329(a) of this title;

that employer shall be subject to a civil action for the collection of past due payments as if those payments were contributions pursuant to subsections 1329(b) and 1334(a) of this title; and

that employer shall be subject to those actions for the collection of past due payments as if those payments were contributions pursuant to subsections 1329(c) and (d), 1334(b) and (c), and section 1336 of this title; however, those provisions shall not apply to the State of Vermont.

Authority to terminate elections. If any nonprofit organization is delinquent in making payments in lieu of contributions as required under this subsection, the Commissioner may terminate such organization’s election to make payments in lieu of contributions as of the beginning of the next taxable year, and the termination shall be effective for that and the next taxable year.

Allocation of benefit costs. Each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall pay to the Commissioner for the Fund the amount of regular benefits plus the amount of one-half of extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of such employer. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by more than one employer and one or more of such employers are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount payable to the Fund by each employer that is liable for such payments shall be determined in accordance with subdivisions (5)(A) and (B) of this subsection (c):

Proportionate allocation when fewer than all base-period employers are liable for reimbursement. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by one or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions and on wages paid by one or more employers who are liable for contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base-period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all of his or her base-period employers.

Proportionate allocation when all base-period employers are liable for reimbursement. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by two or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each employer shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base-period wages paid to the individual by the employer bear to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all of his or her base-period employers.

Group accounts. Two or more employers that have become liable for payments in lieu of contributions, in accordance with the provisions of this section and section 1380 of this title, may file a joint application to the Commissioner for the establishment of a group account for the purpose of sharing the cost of benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of such employers. Each application shall identify and authorize a group representative to act as the group’s agent for the purpose of this section. Upon his or her approval of the application, the Commissioner shall establish a group account for such employers effective as of the beginning of the calendar quarter in which he or she receives the application and shall notify the group’s representative of the effective date of the account. The account shall remain in effect for not less than two years and thereafter until terminated at the discretion of the Commissioner or upon application by the group. Upon establishment of the account, each member of the group shall be liable for payments in lieu of contributions with respect to each calendar quarter in the amount that bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid in such quarter that are attributable to service performed in the employ of all members of the group as the total wages paid for service in employment by such member in such quarter bear to the total wages paid during such quarter for service performed in the employ of all members of the group. The Board shall prescribe regulations as it deems necessary with respect to applications for establishment, maintenance, and termination of group accounts that are authorized by this subdivision, for addition of new members to, and withdrawal of active members from, such accounts, and for the determination of the amounts that are payable under this section by members of the group and the time and manner of such payments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, any nonprofit organization that prior to January 1, 1969, paid contributions required by this section, and, pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, elects within 30 days after January 1, 1972, to make payments in lieu of contributions, shall not be required to make any such payment on account of any regular or extended benefits paid, on the basis of wages paid by such organization to individuals for weeks of unemployment which begin on and after the effective date of the election until the total amount of benefits equals the amount (1) by which the contributions paid by the organization with respect to the two-year period before the effective date of the election under subsection (b) of this section exceed (2) the total amount of unemployment benefits paid for the same period that were attributable to service performed in the employ of the organization and were charged to the experience rating record of the organization.

In lieu of contributions required of employers subject to this chapter, the State of Vermont, including State hospitals but excluding any State institution of higher education, shall pay to the Commissioner, for the Unemployment Compensation Fund, an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid, including the full amount of extended benefits paid, attributable to service by individuals in the employ of the State. At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall bill the State for the amount of benefits paid during such quarter or other prescribed period that is attributable to service in the employ of the State. Subdivisions (c)(3)(C) through (3)(F), inclusive, and subdivisions (c)(5) and (6) of this section as they apply to nonprofit organizations shall also apply to the State of Vermont, except that the State shall be liable for all benefits paid, including the full amount of extended benefits paid, attributable to service in the employ of the State.

Any municipality, any State institution of higher education, and any political or governmental subdivisions or instrumentalities of the State shall pay contributions unless it elects to pay to the Commissioner for the Unemployment Compensation Fund, an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid, including the full amount of extended benefits paid, attributable to service by individuals in the employ of these entities. Subsections (a) and (b) and subdivisions (c)(3)(C) through (3)(F), inclusive, and subdivisions (c)(4) through (6), inclusive of this section as they apply to nonprofit organizations shall also apply to the entities designated in this subsection, except that these entities shall be liable for all benefits paid, including the full amount of extended benefits paid, attributable to service in the employ of these entities.

Any entity designated in this subsection which is, or becomes, subject to this chapter on January 1, 1978 may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than one calendar year beginning with January 1, 1978 provided it files with the Commissioner a written notice of its election within the 30-day period immediately following that date.

Any entity designated in this subsection which becomes subject to this chapter after January 1, 1978 may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than one calendar year following the date on which the subjectivity begins by filing a written notice of its election with the Commissioner not later than 30 days immediately following the date of the determination of that subjectivity.

Any entity designated in this subsection which makes an election in accordance with subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection will continue to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions until it files with the Commissioner a written notice terminating its election not later than 30 days prior to the beginning of the calendar year for which the termination shall first be effective.

Any entity designated in this subsection which has been paying contributions under this chapter for a period subsequent to January 1, 1978 may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the Commissioner not later than 30 days prior to the beginning of any calendar year a written notice of election to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions. The election shall not be terminable by the organization for that year and the next year.

The Commissioner may for good cause extend the period within which a notice of election, or a notice of termination, must be filed and may permit an election to be retroactive but not any earlier than with respect to benefits paid after the date that entity became subject to this chapter.

The Commissioner shall notify each entity designated in this subsection of any determinations which he or she may make of its status as an employer and of the effective date of any election which it makes and of any termination of that election. The determination shall be subject to reconsideration and to appeal and review in accordance with the provisions of section 1337a of this title.

Any employer who makes payments in lieu of contributions under the provisions of this section is considered to be self-insuring and shall pay to the Commissioner for the Unemployment Compensation Fund such amounts as the Commissioner finds to be due under this chapter, including benefits paid but denied on appeal or benefits paid in error which cannot be properly charged either against another employer who makes payments in lieu of contributions or against the experience-rating record of another employer who pays contributions. Benefits improperly paid where repayment by the claimant is ordered pursuant to subsection 1347(a) or (b) of this title will be credited to the employer’s account when repayment from the claimant is actually received by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1963, No. 106

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1964;

1971, No. 77

, § 3, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1977, No. 64

, §§ 8-11, 23;

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 14, 1980;

1981, No. 86

, § 9, eff. May 10, 1981;

1983, No. 16

, §§ 3-5, eff. April 4, 1983;

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1991, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 2

(Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 9, 2009;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1321a.
[Repealed.]

§ 1322.
Reports; liability.

Every employer shall file with the Commissioner periodic reports on such forms and at such times as the Commissioner may prescribe to disclose his or her liability for contributions under this chapter.

Every employer subject to this chapter who sells in bulk 50 percent or more of his or her assets, including any stock of goods, wares, or merchandise of any kind, fixtures, machinery, equipment, buildings, or real estate, when such sale constitutes the sale of the employer’s business to another shall give the Commissioner 10 days’ notice of the sale before the completion of the transfer of the property. The employer shall file all contribution reports with the Commissioner to the date of the proposed transfer of property and pay all contributions, interest, and penalties due and payable thereon. The employer shall also file the detailed quarterly wage report required by section 1314a of this title (subsequent to June 30, 1986) covering employee wages to date of proposed transfer. When the reports are filed the Commissioner shall furnish to the employer within 10 days thereafter a certificate showing that all reports have been filed and contributions, interest, and penalties paid to the date of the proposed transfer. If the certificate is not furnished by the Commissioner within 10 days no liability may thereafter be imposed upon the purchaser. The employer shall present the certificate to the purchaser of the property. The failure of the purchaser to require the certificate makes the purchaser liable to the Commissioner for the unpaid contributions, interest, and penalties owed by the employer in an amount not to exceed the reasonable value of the assets purchased. The liability imposed upon the purchaser by this subsection shall be secondary to the liability of the employer.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to sales made under any order of court or to any sales made by assignees for the benefit of creditors, executors, administrators, receivers, or any public officer in his or her official capacity or by any officer of the court or to any other transfer excepted under Uniform Commercial Code, 9A V.S.A. § 6-103.

An employing unit which has been liable otherwise than by its election to pay contributions as an employer under this chapter for any calendar year shall file such reports and pay such contributions for the next succeeding calendar year as the Commissioner may prescribe.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1967, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 17, 1968;

1985, No. 50

, § 7.

§ 1322a.
Out-of-state or nonresident subcontractors.

Any contractor, who is or becomes an employer under the provisions of this chapter, who contracts with any out-of-state or nonresident subcontractor, who also is or becomes an employer under the provisions of this chapter, shall withhold sufficient monies on said contract to guarantee that all contributions, penalties, and interest are paid upon completion of said contract, or shall require of said subcontractor a good and sufficient bond guaranteeing payment of all contributions, penalties, and interest due or to become due with respect to wages paid for employment on said contract.
Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall render said contractor directly liable for such contributions, penalties, and interest due from said subcontractor and the Commissioner shall have all of the remedies of collection against said contractor under the provisions of this chapter as though the services in question were performed directly for said contractor.
Any such contractor who shall become liable for and pay contributions with respect to individuals in the employ of any such subcontractor may recover the same from such subcontractor. For the purpose of this section, the words “contractor” and “subcontractor” mean and include individuals, partnerships, firms or corporations, or other associations of persons engaged in the business of construction, alteration, repairing, dismantling, or demolition of buildings, roads, bridges, viaducts, sewers, water and gas mains, streets, disposal plants, water filters, tanks and towers, airports, dams, water wells, pipelines, and every other type of structure, project, development, or improvement coming within the definition of real property.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 115

, eff. June 22, 1965.

§ 1323.
Termination of coverage; agreement by employee to make contribution.

An employing unit shall cease to be an employer subject to this chapter only as of the first day of January of any calendar year, if it files with the Commissioner, on or before March 31 next following, a written application for termination of coverage, and the Commissioner finds that such employing unit was not an employer during the preceding calendar year, but these requirements may be waived by the Commissioner for good cause.

The Commissioner may terminate coverage of any employing unit on his or her own motion when he or she finds that the employing unit has not selected coverage in accordance with subdivision 1301(5)(E) of this title and:

that the employing unit has not been an employer for the period of one year immediately preceding; or

that the person who is the employing unit is deceased; or

that the employing unit has ceased to employ at least one person within the State.

Any agreement by an individual in his or her employ to pay the whole or any portion of the employer contributions required by this chapter shall be void and no employer shall make any deduction for such purpose from the wages or salary of any individual in his or her employ.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1969, No. 43

.

§ 1324.
Rate of contribution.

For contribution rate years beginning prior to July 1, 1987, the standard rate of contributions shall be five and four-tenths percent. Each employer who has not been subject to this chapter for a sufficient period of time to have his or her rate computed under section 1326 of this title shall pay contributions at a rate, not exceeding five and four-tenths percent, that is the higher of (1) one percent or (2) that percent represented by rate class 11 in applicable rate schedule determined pursuant to section 1326 of this title, in effect with respect to the calendar quarter for which contributions are payable.

For contribution rate years beginning July 1, 1987 and subsequent thereto:

the standard rate of contributions shall be five and four-tenths percent;

each employer who has not been subject to this chapter for a sufficient period of time to have the rate computed under section 1326 of this title shall pay contributions at the rate of one percent, except that foreign corporations classified in the three-digit North American Industry Classification System Code as 236, 237, or 238 shall pay contributions at a rate equal to the average rate as of the most recent computation date paid by all employers so classified.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 77

, § 4, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1977, No. 64

, § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 1977;

1983, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 81

;

2001, No. 56

, § 3;

2003, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.